Hawaii statutes.
§604-15 Rules by
supreme court. The supreme court may from time to time, by general rules,
prescribe forms for carrying section 604-13 into effect, and make all other
needful regulations. [L 1868, p 21; RL 1925, §2282; RL 1935, §3772; RL 1945,
§9682; RL 1955, §216-13; HRS §604-15]

Revision Note

Reference to repealed §604-14, deleted.

Cross References

Other provisions for rules, see §602-11.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next